Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 3.1. Control of Rabies.

§ 32.1-48.1.
Regulation of State Health Commissioner declaring existence of rabies; display and publication.

Whenever the State Health Commissioner is informed that an outbreak of rabies has occurred in a county or city, he may, after consulting with the Commissioner of Agriculture and Consumer Services and the Executive Director of the Department of Wildlife Resources, adopt a regulation declaring the existence of rabies in such county or city and containing such requirements as are hereinafter set forth. Such regulations shall be prominently displayed throughout the county or city and shall be published therein by signs or otherwise to call the attention of the public to the existence of such outbreak.

History.

1954, c. 339, § 29-213.1; 1987, c. 488; 2020, c. 958.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 958 substituted “Department of Wildlife Resources” for “Department of Game and Inland Fisheries” in the first sentence.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

9A M.J. Game and Game Laws, § 1.

§ 32.1-48.2.
Regulation of Commissioner requiring vaccination or inoculation of dogs.

When the State Health Commissioner has declared that an outbreak of rabies exists in a county or city, he may adopt a regulation requiring all dogs therein to be vaccinated or inoculated against rabies, with such exceptions as he deems appropriate. Such regulation shall set forth the persons by whom and the time within which such vaccination or inoculation may be required. The State Health Commissioner may establish such clinics and furnish other services and supplies as will enable the prompt vaccination or inoculation of all dogs in such county or city.

History.

1954, c. 339, § 29-213.2; 1987, c. 488.

§ 32.1-48.3.
Regulations of Commissioner covering local ordinances and requirements.

If the governing body of the county or city in which the outbreak exists does not adopt, under §

3.2-6522

, subsection A of §

3.2-6525

, §§

3.2-6538

,

3.2-6539

, and

3.2-6546

, ordinances, regulations and measures to prohibit the running at large of dogs and to prevent the spread of rabies, the State Health Commissioner is authorized to adopt regulations providing for the matters contained in such sections and to enforce the same in the same manner as if they had been specifically adopted by the governing body of the county or city involved, and the provisions of such sections shall apply mutatis mutandis to the regulations adopted by the Commissioner hereunder.

History.

1954, c. 339, § 29-213.3; 1987, c. 488; 2001, c. 674.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, Title 3.2 references were substituted for Title 3.1 references to conform to the title revision by Acts 2008, c. 860, effective October 1, 2008.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 674 substituted “subsection A of § 3.1-796.100” for “3.1-796.100,” and inserted “to” preceding “enforce the same.”

§ 32.1-48.4.
Commissioner to cooperate with local governing bodies and agencies.

The Commissioner shall, insofar as practicable, cooperate with the local governing body and agencies of the county or city involved to the end that a joint program may be adopted and enforced for the reduction and elimination of rabies.

History.

1954, c. 339, § 29-213.4; 1987, c. 488.